Utah statutes.
63G-6a-602.   Contracts awarded by bidding.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority shall award a contract for a procurement by bidding, in accordance with the rules of the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  The bidding standard procurement process is appropriate to use when cost is the major factor in determining the award of a procurement.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

